Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.80.030

County central committee—Organization meetings.

The county central committee of each major political party consists of the precinct committee officers of the party from the several voting precincts of the county. Following each state general election held in even-numbered years, this committee shall meet for the purpose of organization at an easily accessible location within the county, subsequent to the certification of precinct committee officers by the county auditor and no later than the second Saturday of the following January. The authorized officers of the retiring committee shall cause notice of the time and place of the meeting to be mailed to each precinct committee officer at least seventy-two hours before the date of the meeting.

At its organization meeting, the county central committee shall elect a chair and vice chair of opposite sexes.

[ 2003 c 111 s 2003; 1987 c 295 s 12; 1973 c 85 s 1; 1973 c 4 s 5; 1965 c 9 s 29.42.030. Prior: 1961 c 130 s 4; prior: 1943 c 178 s 1, part; 1939 c 48 s 1, part; 1927 c 200 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 158 s 1, part; 1909 c 82 s 6, part; 1907 c 209 s 22, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 5198, part. Formerly RCW 29.42.030.]